Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2533.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that certain jurisdictions bear a disproportionate share of the sexually violent predators that release from total confinement. This is a clear violation of fair share principles. The legislature intends to augment requirements the court should consider prior to granting a release for a sexually violent predator from total confinement to a less restrictive alternative placement. The legislature also intends to create a statutory option for local jurisdictions to reject placement of a sexually violent predator if the county is not the county of commitment and the placement does not comply with fair share principles.Sec. 2. RCW 71.09.020 and 2021 c 236 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Department" means the department of social and health services.(2) "Fair share principles" and "fair share principles of release" means that each county has adequate options for conditional release housing placements in a number generally equivalent to the number of residents from that county who are subject to total confinement pursuant to this chapter.(3) "Health care facility" means any hospital, hospice care center, licensed or certified health care facility, health maintenance organization regulated under chapter 48.46 RCW, federally qualified health maintenance organization, federally approved renal dialysis center or facility, or federally approved blood bank.(4) "Health care practitioner" means an individual or firm licensed or certified to engage actively in a regulated health profession.(5) "Health care services" means those services provided by health professionals licensed pursuant to RCW 18.120.020(4).(6) "Health profession" means those licensed or regulated professions set forth in RCW 18.120.020(4).(7) "Less restrictive alternative" means court-ordered treatment in a setting less restrictive than total confinement which satisfies the conditions set forth in RCW 71.09.092. A less restrictive alternative may not include placement in the community protection program as pursuant to RCW 71A.12.230.(8) "Likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not confined in a secure facility" means that the person more probably than not will engage in such acts if released unconditionally from detention on the sexually violent predator petition. Such likelihood must be evidenced by a recent overt act if the person is not totally confined at the time the petition is filed under RCW 71.09.030 or by prima facie evidence of a lack of remorse or failure to participate in sex offender treatment while in total confinement.(9) "Mental abnormality" means a congenital or acquired condition affecting the emotional or volitional capacity which predisposes the person to the commission of criminal sexual acts in a degree constituting such person a menace to the health and safety of others.(10) "Personality disorder" means an enduring pattern of inner experience and behavior that deviates markedly from the expectations of the individual's culture, is pervasive and inflexible, has onset in adolescence or early adulthood, is stable over time and leads to distress or impairment. Purported evidence of a personality disorder must be supported by testimony of a licensed forensic psychologist or psychiatrist.(11) "Predatory" means acts directed towards: (a) Strangers; (b) individuals with whom a relationship has been established or promoted for the primary purpose of victimization; or (c) persons of casual acquaintance with whom no substantial personal relationship exists.(12) "Prosecuting agency" means the prosecuting attorney of the county where the person was convicted or charged or the attorney general if requested by the prosecuting attorney, as provided in RCW 71.09.030.(13) "Recent overt act" means any act, threat, or combination thereof that has either caused harm of a sexually violent nature or creates a reasonable apprehension of such harm in the mind of an objective person who knows of the history and mental condition of the person engaging in the act or behaviors.(14) "Risk potential activity" or "risk potential facility" means an activity or facility that provides a higher incidence of risk to the public from persons conditionally released from the special commitment center. Risk potential activities and facilities include: Public and private schools, school bus stops, licensed day care and licensed preschool facilities, public parks, publicly dedicated trails, sports fields, playgrounds, recreational and community centers, churches, synagogues, temples, mosques, public libraries, public and private youth camps, and others identified by the department following the hearings on a potential site required in RCW 71.09.315. For purposes of this chapter, "school bus stops" does not include bus stops established primarily for public transit.(15) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services or the secretary's designee.(16) "Secure community transition facility" means a residential facility for persons civilly committed and conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative under this chapter. A secure community transition facility has supervision and security, and either provides or ensures the provision of sex offender treatment services. Secure community transition facilities include but are not limited to the facility established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250(1)(a)(i) and any community-based facilities established under this chapter and operated by the secretary or under contract with the secretary.(17) "Secure facility" means a residential facility for persons civilly confined under the provisions of this chapter that includes security measures sufficient to protect the community. Such facilities include total confinement facilities, secure community transition facilities, and any residence used as a court-ordered placement under RCW 71.09.096.(18) "Sexually violent offense" means an act committed on, before, or after July 1, 1990, that is: (a) An act defined in Title 9A RCW as rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree by forcible compulsion, rape of a child in the first or second degree, statutory rape in the first or second degree, indecent liberties by forcible compulsion, indecent liberties against a child under age fourteen, incest against a child under age fourteen, or child molestation in the first or second degree; (b) a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1990, that is comparable to a sexually violent offense as defined in (a) of this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for a felony offense that under the laws of this state would be a sexually violent offense as defined in this subsection; (c) an act of murder in the first or second degree, assault in the first or second degree, assault of a child in the first or second degree, kidnapping in the first or second degree, burglary in the first degree, residential burglary, or unlawful imprisonment, which act, either at the time of sentencing for the offense or subsequently during civil commitment proceedings pursuant to this chapter, has been determined beyond a reasonable doubt to have been sexually motivated, as that term is defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or (d) an act as described in chapter 9A.28 RCW, that is an attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of the felonies designated in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection.(19) "Sexually violent predator" means any person who has been convicted of or charged with a crime of sexual violence and who suffers from a mental abnormality or personality disorder which makes the person likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not confined in a secure facility.(20) "Total confinement facility" means a secure facility that provides supervision and sex offender treatment services in a total confinement setting. Total confinement facilities include the special commitment center and any similar facility designated as a total confinement facility by the secretary.(21) "Treatment" means the sex offender specific treatment program at the special commitment center or a specific course of sex offender treatment pursuant to RCW 71.09.092 (1) and (2).Sec. 3. RCW 71.09.090 and 2021 c 236 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) If the secretary determines that the person's condition has so changed that the person no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator, the secretary ((shall))may authorize the person to petition the court for unconditional discharge. The petition shall be filed with the court and served upon the prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment. The court, upon receipt of the petition for unconditional discharge, shall within 45 days order a hearing.(b) If the secretary determines that the person's condition has so changed that conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that adequately protect the community, then the secretary shall authorize the person to petition the court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative. Upon receipt of the petition, the court shall order the department to identify a less restrictive alternative placement that satisfies RCW 71.09.092 (1) through (((4)))(7). Once identified, notice of the placement shall be filed with the court and served upon: The prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment; any person or persons identified in RCW 71.09.140(2)(a) who have opted to receive notifications under this chapter; and the person and his or her counsel. If the department cannot identify a placement available to the person that satisfies RCW 71.09.092 (1) through (((4)))(7) within 90 days, the department shall provide a written certification to the court, the prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment, and the person and his or her counsel, detailing the efforts of the department to identify a qualifying placement. Upon the department's certification, the person may propose a placement that satisfies RCW 71.09.092 (1) through (3) if the person also satisfies RCW 71.09.092 (5) through (7). After a less restrictive placement has been proposed by either the department or the person, the court shall within 45 days order a hearing.(2)(a) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the person from otherwise petitioning the court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge without the secretary's approval. The secretary shall provide the committed person with an annual written notice of the person's right to petition the court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge over the secretary's objection. The notice shall contain a waiver of rights. The secretary shall file the notice and waiver form and the annual report with the court. If the person does not affirmatively waive the right to petition, the court shall set a show cause hearing to determine whether probable cause exists to warrant a hearing on whether the person's condition has so changed that: (i) ((He or she))The person no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator and has expressed remorse for the sex offenses for which the person was convicted; or (ii) conditional release to a proposed less restrictive alternative would be in the best interest of the person ((and)), conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community, and the person has expressed remorse for the sex offenses for which the person was convicted.(b)(i) The committed person shall have a right to have an attorney represent him or her at the show cause hearing, which may be conducted solely on the basis of affidavits or declarations, but the person is not entitled to be present at the show cause hearing. At the show cause hearing, the prosecuting agency shall present prima facie evidence establishing that: (A) ((That the))The committed person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator; ((and)) (B) ((that)) a less restrictive alternative is not in the best interest of the person and conditions cannot be imposed that adequately protect the community; (C) the person refused to participate in sex offender treatment or programming while in total confinement; or (D) the person has not expressed remorse for the sex offenses for which they were criminally convicted.(ii)(A) If the state produces prima facie evidence that the committed person continues to be a sexually violent predator, then the state's burden under (b)(i)(A) of this subsection is met and an unconditional release trial may not be ordered unless the committed person produces evidence satisfying: Subsection (4)(a) of this section; and subsection (4)(b) (i) or (ii) of this section.(B) If the state produces prima facie evidence that a less restrictive alternative is not appropriate for the committed person, then the state's burden under (b)(i)(B) of this subsection is met, and a conditional release trial may not be ordered unless the committed person:(I) Produces evidence satisfying: Subsection (4)(a) of this section; and subsection (4)(b) (i) or (ii) of this section; and(II) Presents the court with a specific placement satisfying the requirements of RCW 71.09.092.(C) If the state produces prima facie evidence that the person failed to participate in sex offender treatment while in total confinement, then the state's burden under (b)(i)(C) of this subsection is met and an unconditional release trial may not be ordered.(D) If the state produces prima facie evidence that the person has not expressed remorse for the sex offenses for which they were convicted, then the state's burden under (b)(i)(D) of this subsection is met and an unconditional release trial may not be ordered.(iii) In making the showing required under (b)(i) of this subsection, the state may rely exclusively upon the annual report prepared pursuant to RCW 71.09.070. The committed person may present responsive affidavits or declarations to which the state may reply.(c)(i) If the court at the show cause hearing determines that either: (A) The state has failed to present prima facie evidence that the committed person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator; or (B) probable cause exists to believe that the person's condition has so changed that the person no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator, then the court shall set a hearing on the issue of unconditional discharge.(ii) If the court at the show cause hearing determines that the state has failed to present prima facie evidence that no proposed less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and conditions cannot be imposed that would adequately protect the community, the court shall enter an order directing the department to propose a less restrictive alternative that satisfies RCW 71.09.092 (1) through (4) if the person satisfies RCW 71.09.092 (5) through (7). If the department cannot identify a placement available to the person that satisfies RCW 71.09.092 (1) through (4) within 90 days, the department shall provide a written certification to the court, the prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment, and the person and his or her counsel, detailing the efforts of the department to identify a qualifying placement. Upon the department's certification and only if the person has expressed remorse for the sex offenses for which they were criminally convicted and willingly participated in sex offender treatment while in total confinement, the person may propose a placement that satisfies RCW 71.09.092 (1) through (3). After a less restrictive placement has been proposed by either the department or the person, the court shall set a hearing on the issue of conditional release.(iii) If the court at the show cause hearing determines, based on the evidence submitted by the person, that probable cause exists to believe that ((release)): (A) Release to a less restrictive alternative would be in the best interest of the person ((and)); (B) conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community; (C) the person has expressed remorse for the sex offenses for which they were criminally convicted; and (D) the person willingly participated in sex offender treatment while in total confinement, the court shall set a hearing on the issue of conditional release if the person presents the court with a specific placement that satisfies the requirements of RCW 71.09.092.(d) If the court has not previously considered the issue of release to a less restrictive alternative, either through a trial on the merits or through the procedures set forth in RCW 71.09.094(1), or if an immediately preceding less restrictive alternative was revoked due to the loss of adequate housing or treatment for reasons other than noncompliance with housing requirements, treatment, or other conditions of the less restrictive alternative, the court shall consider whether release to a less restrictive alternative would be in the best interests of the person and conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community, without considering whether the person's condition has changed, but only if the person has expressed remorse for the sex offenses for which they were convicted and willingly participated in sex offender treatment while in total confinement.(3)(a) At the hearing resulting from subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the committed person shall be entitled to be present and to the benefit of all constitutional protections that were afforded to the person at the initial commitment proceeding. The prosecuting agency shall represent the state and shall have a right to a jury trial and to have the committed person evaluated by experts chosen by the state. The prosecuting agency shall have a right to a current evaluation of the person by experts chosen by the state. The judge may require the person to complete any or all of the following procedures or tests if requested by the evaluator: (i) A clinical interview; (ii) psychological testing; (iii) plethysmograph testing; (iv) a department of corrections risk assessment; and (((iv)))(v) polygraph testing. The judge may order the person to complete any other procedures and tests relevant to the evaluation. The state is responsible for the costs of the evaluation. The committed person shall also have the right to a jury trial and the right to have experts evaluate him or her on his or her behalf and the court shall appoint an expert if the person is indigent and requests an appointment.(b) Whenever any indigent person is subjected to an evaluation under (a) of this subsection, the office of public defense is responsible for the cost of one expert or professional person conducting an evaluation on the person's behalf. When the person wishes to be evaluated by a qualified expert or professional person of his or her own choice, such expert or professional person must be permitted to have reasonable access to the person for the purpose of such evaluation, as well as to all relevant medical and psychological records and reports. In the case of a person who is indigent, the court shall, upon the person's request, assist the person in obtaining an expert or professional person to perform an evaluation or participate in the hearing on the person's behalf. Nothing in this chapter precludes the person from paying for additional expert services at his or her own expense.(c) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be unconditionally discharged, the burden of proof shall be upon the state to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the committed person's condition remains such that the person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator or the person has failed to either: (i) Express remorse for the sex offenses for which they were convicted or (ii) willingly participate in sex offender treatment during total confinement. Evidence of the prior commitment trial and disposition is admissible. The recommitment proceeding shall otherwise proceed as set forth in RCW 71.09.050 and 71.09.060.(d) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative, the burden of proof at the hearing shall be upon the state to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that ((conditional)): (i) Conditional release to any proposed less restrictive alternative ((either: (i) Is))is not in the best interest of the committed person; ((or)) (ii) conditional release to any proposed less restrictive alternative does not include conditions that would adequately protect the community; (iii) the person has failed to express remorse for the sex offenses for which they were convicted; or (iv) the person failed to willingly participate in sex offender treatment during total confinement. Evidence of the prior commitment trial and disposition is admissible.(4)(a) Probable cause exists to believe that a person's condition has "so changed," under subsection (2) of this section, only when evidence exists, since the person's last commitment trial, or less restrictive alternative revocation proceeding, of a substantial change in the person's physical or mental condition such that the person either no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator or that a conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the person's best interest and conditions can be imposed to adequately protect the community.(b) A new trial proceeding under subsection (3) of this section may be ordered, or a trial proceeding may be held, only when there is current evidence from a licensed professional of one of the following and the evidence presents a change in condition since the person's last commitment trial proceeding:(i) An identified physiological change to the person, such as paralysis, stroke, or dementia, that renders the committed person unable to commit a sexually violent act and this change is permanent; or(ii) A change in the person's mental condition brought about through positive response to continuing participation in treatment which indicates that the person meets the standard for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or that the person would be safe to be at large if unconditionally released from commitment.(c) For purposes of this section, a change in a single demographic factor, without more, does not establish probable cause for a new trial proceeding under subsection (3) of this section. As used in this section, a single demographic factor includes, but is not limited to, a change in the chronological age, marital status, or gender of the committed person.(5) When the court enters an order for unconditional discharge of a person from an immediately preceding less restrictive placement, the court must direct the clerk to transmit a copy of the order to the department of corrections for discharge process and termination of cause.(6) The jurisdiction of the court over a person civilly committed pursuant to this chapter continues until such time as the person is unconditionally discharged.(7) During any period of confinement pursuant to a criminal conviction, or for any period of detention awaiting trial on criminal charges, this section is suspended.(8) In all proceedings under this section, special weight must be given to whether the person expressed remorse for the sex offenses for which they were convicted. If the person has not expressed remorse, the court should presume that the community cannot be adequately protected if the person is granted a conditional less restrictive alternative or an unconditional discharge.Sec. 4. RCW 71.09.092 and 2021 c 236 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:Before the court may enter an order directing conditional release to a less restrictive alternative, it must find the following: (1) The person will be treated by a treatment provider who is qualified to provide such treatment in the state of Washington under chapter 18.155 RCW; (2) the treatment provider has presented a specific course of treatment and has agreed to assume responsibility for such treatment and will report progress to the court on a regular basis, and will report violations immediately to the court, the prosecutor, the supervising community corrections officer, and the superintendent of the special commitment center; (3) housing exists in Washington that complies with distance restrictions, is sufficiently secure to protect the community, and the person or agency providing housing to the conditionally released person has agreed in writing to accept the person, to provide the level of security required by the court, and immediately to report to the court, the prosecutor, the supervising community corrections officer, and the superintendent of the special commitment center if the person leaves the housing to which he or she has been assigned without authorization; (4) if the department has proposed housing that is outside of the county of commitment, a documented effort was made by the department to ensure that placement is consistent with fair share principles of release; (5) the person is willing to comply with the treatment provider and all requirements imposed by the treatment provider and by the court; ((and)) (6) the person has expressed remorse for the sex offenses for which they were criminally convicted; (7) the person willingly participated in sex offender treatment while in total confinement; and (8) the person will be under the supervision of the department of corrections and is willing to comply with supervision requirements imposed by the department of corrections.Sec. 5. RCW 71.09.094 and 2001 c 286 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon the conclusion of the evidence in a hearing held pursuant to RCW 71.09.090 or through summary judgment proceedings prior to such a hearing, if the court finds that there is no legally sufficient evidentiary basis for a reasonable jury to find that the conditions set forth in RCW 71.09.092 have been met, the court shall grant a motion by the state for a judgment as a matter of law on the issue of conditional release to a less restrictive alternative.(2) Whenever the issue of conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is submitted to the jury, the court shall instruct the jury to return a verdict in substantially the following form: Has the state proved beyond a reasonable doubt that ((either)): (a) The proposed less restrictive alternative is not in the best interests of respondent; ((or)) (b) the proposed less restrictive alternative does not include conditions that would adequately protect the community; (c) the person has not expressed remorse for the crimes for which they were convicted; or (d) the person did not willingly participate in sex offender treatment while in total confinement? Answer: Yes or No.Sec. 6. RCW 71.09.096 and 2025 c 33 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If the court or jury determines that conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and includes conditions that would adequately protect the community, and the court determines that the minimum conditions set forth in RCW 71.09.092 and in this section are met, the court ((shall))may enter judgment and direct a conditional release.(2) The court shall impose any additional conditions necessary to ensure compliance with treatment and to protect the community. If the court finds that conditions do not exist that will both ensure the person's compliance with treatment and protect the community, then the person shall be remanded to the custody of the department of social and health services for control, care, and treatment in a secure facility as designated in RCW 71.09.060(1).(3) If the service provider designated by the court to provide inpatient or outpatient treatment or to monitor or supervise any other terms and conditions of a person's placement in a less restrictive alternative is other than the department of social and health services or the department of corrections, then the service provider so designated must agree in writing to provide such treatment, monitoring, or supervision in accord with this section. Any person providing or agreeing to provide treatment, monitoring, or supervision services pursuant to this chapter may be compelled to testify and any privilege with regard to such person's testimony is deemed waived.(4)(a) Prior to authorizing any release to a less restrictive alternative, the court shall impose such conditions upon the person as are necessary to ensure the safety of the community, which must include, at minimum, the condition that the person will be subject to electronic monitoring that, to the extent feasible, provides real-time tracking, programmable inclusion and exclusion zones, and the ability to provide notifications if the person tampers with the monitoring device or enters an exclusion zone. In imposing conditions, the court must impose a restriction on the proximity of the person's residence to public or private schools providing instruction to kindergarten or any grades one through 12 in accordance with RCW 72.09.340. Courts shall require a minimum distance restriction of 500 feet on the proximity of the person's residence to child care facilities and public or private schools providing instruction to kindergarten or any grades one through 12. The court shall order the department of corrections to investigate the less restrictive alternative and, within 60 days of the order to investigate, recommend any additional conditions to the court. These conditions shall be individualized to address the person's specific risk factors and criminogenic needs and may include, but are not limited to, the following: Specification of residence or restrictions on residence including distance restrictions, specification of contact with a reasonable number of individuals upon the person's request who are verified by the department of corrections to be appropriate social contacts, prohibition of contact with potential or past victims, prohibition of alcohol and other drug use, participation in a specific course of inpatient or outpatient treatment that may include monitoring by the use of polygraph and plethysmograph, monitoring through the use of global positioning system technology, supervision by a department of corrections community corrections officer, a requirement that the person remain within the state or other stipulated geographically bounded area unless the person receives prior authorization by the court, and any other conditions that the court determines are in the best interest of the person or others. A copy of the conditions of release shall be given to the person and to any designated service providers.(b) To the greatest extent possible, the person, person's counsel, prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment, treatment provider, supervising community corrections officer, and appropriate clinical staff of the special commitment center shall meet and collaborate to craft individualized, narrowly tailored, and empirically based conditions to present to the court to help facilitate the person's successful transition to the community.(5)(a) Prior to authorizing release to a less restrictive alternative proposed by the department, the court shall consider whether the person's less restrictive alternative placement is in accordance with fair share principles and adequately notifies potentially impacted tribes. To ensure equitable distribution of releases, and prevent the disproportionate grouping of persons subject to less restrictive orders in any one county, or in any one jurisdiction or community within a county, ((the legislature finds it is appropriate for)) releases to a less restrictive alternative ((to))shall occur in a manner that adheres to fair share principles. The legislature recognizes that there may be reasons why the department may not recommend that a person be released to his or her county of commitment, including availability of individualized resources, the person's support needs, or when the court determines that the person's return to his or her county of commitment would be inappropriate considering any court-issued protection orders, victim safety concerns that cannot be addressed through use of global positioning system technology, the unavailability of appropriate treatment or facilities that would adequately protect the community, negative influences on the person, and the location of family or other persons or organizations offering support to the person. If the court authorizes conditional release based on the department's proposal to a county other than the county of commitment, the court shall enter specific findings regarding its decision and identify whether the release remains in line with fair share principles.(b)(i) When the department develops a less restrictive alternative placement under this section, it shall attempt to identify a placement satisfying the requirements of RCW 71.09.092 that is aligned with fair share principles and adequately notifies potentially impacted tribes. The department shall document its rationale for the recommended placement.(ii) If the department does not support or recommend conditional release to a less restrictive alternative due to a clinical determination, the department shall document its objection and certify that the department is developing the less restrictive alternative pursuant to a court order and not because of a clinical determination.(iii) When the department develops or proposes a less restrictive alternative placement under this chapter, it shall be considered a predisposition recommendation.(iv) In developing, modifying, and enforcing less restrictive alternatives, the department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.(c)(i) If the committed person is not conditionally released to his or her county of commitment, the department shall provide the ((law and justice))sheriff and county council of the county in which the person is conditionally released with notice and a written explanation, including whether the department remains in compliance with fair share principles regarding releases under this chapter.(ii) If the proposed less restrictive alternative placement is outside of the county of commitment and the placement does not comply with fair share principles, the county wherein the less restrictive alternative placement is proposed may deny the placement within its jurisdiction upon a vote of the elected county officials.(d) For purposes of this section, the person's county of commitment means the county of the court which ordered the person's commitment.(e) This subsection (5) does not apply to releases to a secure community transition facility under RCW 71.09.250.(6)(a) When ordered by the court, the department must provide less restrictive alternative treatment that includes, at a minimum:(i) The services identified in the person's discharge plan as outlined in RCW 71.09.080(4);(ii) The assignment of a community care coordinator;(iii) Regular contacts with providers of court-ordered treatment services;(iv) Community escorts, if needed;(v) A transition plan that addresses the person's access to continued services upon unconditional discharge;(vi) Financial support for necessary housing;(vii) Life skills training and disability accommodations, if needed; and(viii) Assistance in pursuing benefits, education, and employment.(b) At the time the department of corrections is ordered to investigate a proposed less restrictive alternative placement, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall assign a social worker to assist the person with discharge planning, pursuing benefits, and coordination of care prior to release.(i) The social worker shall assist the person with completing applications for benefits prior to the person's release from total confinement.(ii) To promote continuity of care and the individual's success in the community, the department social worker shall be responsible for initiating a clinical transition of care between the last treating clinician at the special commitment center and the person's designated community treatment provider. This transition between one clinical setting to another shall occur no later than 15 days before an individual's release from the special commitment center.(iii) If applicable, the social worker shall assist the person with locating any needed disability accommodations in the community and with obtaining resources to help address the person's identified life skills needs prior to release from total confinement.(7) Any service provider designated to provide inpatient or outpatient treatment shall monthly, or as otherwise directed by the court, submit to the court, to the department of social and health services facility from which the person was released, to the prosecuting agency, to the county sheriff, and to the supervising community corrections officer, a report stating whether the person is complying with the terms and conditions of the conditional release to a less restrictive alternative.(8) Each person released to a less restrictive alternative shall have his or her case reviewed by the court that released him or her no later than one year after such release and annually thereafter until the person is unconditionally discharged. Review may occur in a shorter time or more frequently, if the court, in its discretion on its own motion, or on motion of the person, the secretary, or the prosecuting agency so determines. The questions to be determined by the court are whether the person shall continue to be conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative, and if so, whether a modification to the person's less restrictive alternative order is appropriate to ensure the conditional release remains in the best interest of the person and adequate to protect the victim and the community. The court in making its determination shall be aided by the periodic reports filed pursuant to subsection (7) of this section and the opinions of the secretary and other experts or professional persons.Sec. 7. RCW 71.09.098 and 2025 c 58 s 2041 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any service provider submitting reports pursuant to RCW 71.09.096(7), the supervising community corrections officer, the prosecuting agency, the county sheriff, or the secretary's designee may petition the court for an immediate hearing for the purpose of revoking or modifying the terms of the person's conditional release to a less restrictive alternative if the petitioner believes the released person: (a) Violated or is in violation of the terms and conditions of the court's conditional release order; or (b) is in need of additional care, monitoring, supervision, or treatment.(2) The county sheriff, the community corrections officer, or the secretary's designee may restrict the person's movement in the community until the petition is determined by the court. The person may be taken into custody if:(a) The supervising community corrections officer, the secretary's designee, or a law enforcement officer reasonably believes the person has violated or is in violation of the court's conditional release order; or(b) The supervising community corrections officer or the secretary's designee reasonably believes that the person is in need of additional care, monitoring, supervision, or treatment because the person presents a danger to himself or herself or others if his or her conditional release under the conditions imposed by the court's release order continues.(3)(a) Persons taken into custody pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall:(i) Not be released until such time as a hearing is held to determine whether to revoke or modify the person's conditional release order and the court has issued its decision; and(ii) Be held in the county jail, at a secure community transition facility, or at the total confinement facility, at the discretion of the county sheriff or the secretary's designee.(b) The court shall be notified before the close of the next judicial day that the person has been taken into custody and shall promptly schedule a hearing.(4) Before any hearing to revoke or modify the person's conditional release order, both the prosecuting agency and the released person shall have the right to request an immediate mental examination of the released person. If the conditionally released person is indigent, the court shall, upon request, assist him or her in obtaining a qualified expert or professional person to conduct the examination.(5) At any hearing to revoke or modify the conditional release order:(a) The prosecuting agency shall represent the state, including determining whether to proceed with revocation or modification of the conditional release order;(b) Hearsay evidence is admissible if the court finds that it is otherwise reliable; and(c) The state shall bear the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the person has violated or is in violation of the court's conditional release order or that the person is in need of additional care, monitoring, supervision, or treatment.(6)(a) If the court determines that the state has met its burden referenced in subsection (5)(c) of this section, and the issue before the court is revocation of the court's conditional release order, the court shall consider the evidence presented by the parties and the following factors relevant to whether continuing the person's conditional release is in the person's best interests or adequate to protect the community:(i) The nature of the condition that was violated by the person or that the person was in violation of in the context of the person's criminal history and underlying mental conditions;(ii) The degree to which the violation was intentional or grossly negligent;(iii) The ability and willingness of the released person to strictly comply with the conditional release order;(iv) The degree of progress made by the person in community-based treatment; and(v) The risk to the public or particular persons if the conditional release continues under the conditional release order that was violated.(b) Any factor alone, or in combination, shall support the court's determination to revoke the conditional release order.(7) If the court determines the state has met its burden referenced in subsection (5)(c) of this section, and the issue before the court is modification of the court's conditional release order, the court shall modify the conditional release order by adding conditions if the court determines that the person is in need of additional care, monitoring, supervision, or treatment. The court has authority to modify its conditional release order by substituting a new treatment provider, requiring new housing for the person, or imposing such additional supervision conditions as the court deems appropriate.(8) A person whose conditional release has been revoked shall be remanded to the custody of the secretary for control, care, and treatment in a total confinement facility as designated in RCW 71.09.060(1). The person is thereafter eligible for conditional release only in accord with the provisions of RCW 71.09.090 and related statutes.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---